California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) Upon any judicially ordered distribution of any money or property required to be held in trust and after all expenses of distribution approved by the court have been paid, every passenger has a claim on the trust for payments made for transportation and other travel services not provided. Unless a passenger can identify his or her funds in the trust within the time established by the court, each passenger shall receive a proportional share based on the amount paid.

(j) The seller of travel is not required to comply with the direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (b) if all of the following
 apply:

(1) The payment is made by credit card.

(2) The seller of travel does not deposit, negotiate, or factor the credit card charge or otherwise seek or obtain payment of the credit card charge or the crediting of the amount of the credit card charge to any account over which the seller of travel has any control.

(3) (A) If the charge includes transportation, the carrier that is to provide the transportation processes the credit card charge.

(B) If the charge is only for services, the provider of services processes the credit card charge.

(k) In lieu of the trust account required by this
 article, an adequate bond as set forth in Section 17550.11 may be maintained by the seller of travel. Prior to the advertisement of transportation or services, or both, by the seller of travel, the seller of travel shall file a copy of that bond with the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (AB 1107)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.16.

(a) A seller of travel is exempt from the requirements of subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 17550.15 for all transactions in which the seller of travel is in compliance with paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, or with paragraph (7).

(1) The seller of travel sells, provides, furnishes, contracts for, or arranges air or sea transportation in transactions with persons in California, only from locations in California, and the air or sea transportation or travel services are to be furnished by (A) a registered seller of travel that is in compliance with this article and Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) or (B) an air or sea carrier.

(2) The
 seller of travel forwards the passenger’s funds, without offsetting or reducing the amount forwarded by any amounts due or claimed in connection with any other transaction, to (A) the provider of the transportation or travel services, (B) the Airlines Reporting Corporation, (C) the trust account identified in the registration of the seller of travel to whom the funds are forwarded, or (D) a registered seller of travel whose registration states that the registered seller is exempt pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) from the requirements of Section 17550.15, and the seller of travel who forwards funds pursuant to subparagraph (C) or (D) obtains and keeps a copy of the registration referred to in subparagraph (C) or (D).

(3) The seller of travel is an officially appointed agent in good standing of the Airlines Reporting Corporation and the air transportation, if any, is sold to the passenger pursuant to that agency appointment.

(4) The seller of travel has been in business under the same ownership for a period of three years, unless acquired or formed by a registered seller of travel that has been in business under the same ownership for a period of three years. For the purposes of this paragraph, the following shall not constitute a change in ownership:

(A) Any structural change involving a change in the type of entity, such as from a corporation to a partnership, and not involving the addition of any new, underlying ownership interest.

(B) The deletion of any owner or ownership interest.

(5) The seller of travel sells, provides, furnishes, contracts for, or arranges air or sea transportation or travel services only at retail directly to the general public and not through any
 other seller of travel, all of which air or sea transportation and travel services are to be furnished by other, unrelated providers or sellers of travel.

(6) The seller of travel is in compliance with the requirements of Section 17550.20 and Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35). Any seller of travel seeking to qualify for this exemption shall provide all information necessary for the Attorney General or their delegate to determine that the seller of travel meets the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(7) A seller of travel in a transaction where the air or sea transportation or travel services are furnished by a business entity that (A) is located and providing transportation or travel services outside of the United States and (B) is not in compliance with the provisions of this article is exempt from the requirements of Section 17550.15 for that
 transaction if the seller of travel obtains each passenger’s written acknowledgment of receiving, before making any payment, a clear, conspicuous, and complete written disclosure that the provider of transportation or travel services is not in compliance with the Seller of Travel Law and the transaction is not covered by the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund, and of the attendant risks and consequences thereof.

(8) If the Attorney General or their delegate finds, pursuant to Section 17550.52, that the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation has failed or ceased to operate, a seller of travel who was a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund shall no longer be exempt from compliance with the requirements of Sections 17550.15 and 17550.17.

If Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) ceases to operate for any reason, including, but not limited to, repeal pursuant to former Section
 17550.59, no seller of travel shall be exempt from compliance with the requirements of Sections 17550.15 and 17550.17 unless in compliance with subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) A seller of travel who is a participant, with respect to all sales of air or sea transportation and travel services, in a Consumer Protection Deposit Plan that meets the criteria of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and who complies with paragraph (4) need not comply with Section 17550.15.

(1) The plan is operated and administered by an entity who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Attorney General or their delegate that the operating and administering entity is competent and reliable and that the plan will achieve fully the purposes and objectives of this article. Each approved plan shall include provisions requiring that each participating seller of travel (A) has been engaged in business as a seller of
 travel in the United States under the same ownership for not less than three years, unless acquired or formed by a seller of travel already participating and in good standing in the plan, and (B) has deposited with the administrator of the plan a minimum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in security in the form of a bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit, which security shall be (i) in favor solely of the plan, (ii) held by the plan pursuant to the terms of the plan, (iii) used solely to refund passenger payments or deposits or to complete tours, and (iv) payable solely in the event that (I) the seller of travel fails to refund passenger payments or deposits due as a result of the bankruptcy, insolvency, or cessation of operations of the seller of travel or after the cancellation or material failure by the seller of travel to complete performance of the passenger’s transportation or travel services or (II) the seller of travel fails to replace the security with another meeting the criteria set
 forth in subparagraph (B) no later than 30 days before its expiration.

(2) Claims filed against the Consumer Protection Deposit Plan are decided within 45 days of receipt and paid within 30 days of decision.

(3) The Consumer Protection Deposit Plan has been reviewed and approved in writing by the Attorney General or their delegate as meeting the criteria set forth above, including a finding that the plan will effectuate the purposes of this article. Should the approved plan cease to provide the consumer protections set forth in paragraph (1), the Attorney General or their delegate shall revoke their approval immediately. Upon that revocation, the seller of travel shall no longer be exempt from compliance with the requirements of Sections 17550.15 and 17550.17.

(4) Any participant in a Consumer Protection Deposit Plan
 seeking to qualify for this exemption shall provide all information necessary for the Attorney General or their delegate to determine (A) that the Consumer Protection Deposit Plan in which the seller of travel is a participant meets the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), (B) that the seller of travel is a participant in full compliance with the terms and conditions of an approved consumer protection deposit plan, and (C) provide a written agreement from the authorized representative of the Consumer Protection Deposit Plan in which the plan administrator agrees to give the office of the Attorney General, Consumer Protection Section, immediate written and telephonic notice in the event of termination of the seller of travel’s participation in the plan.

(c) A seller of travel who utilizes for all transactions a Consumer Protection Escrow Plan which meets the criteria of paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, and who complies with
 paragraph (7) is exempt from the requirements of Section 17550.15.

(1) The plan is operated and administered as escrow holder by a federally insured bank that demonstrates to the Attorney General or their delegate that the manner in which it will administer the plan will be consistent with the purposes of this article. Each approved escrow plan shall include provisions requiring that all air tickets sold by participants in the plan be issued through the Airlines Reporting Corporation.

(2) All funds delivered to the escrow holder, by cash, check, charge card, or otherwise, are held and disbursed by the escrow holder for the benefit of, and to protect the interests of, the passenger.

(3) All funds are separately accounted for by booking number and passenger name.

(4) Claims filed against the escrow plan are decided within 45 days of receipt and paid within 30 days of decision.

(5) All passenger funds are to be delivered to the escrow holder as required by Section 17550.15.

(6) The Consumer Protection Escrow Plan has been reviewed and approved in writing by the Attorney General or their delegate as meeting the criteria set forth herein, including a finding that the plan will effectuate the purposes and objectives of this article. Should the approved plan cease to provide the consumer protections set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, the Attorney General or their delegate shall revoke their approval of the plan immediately. Upon that revocation, the seller of travel shall no longer be exempt from compliance with the requirements of Sections 17550.15 and 17550.17.

(7) Any participant in a consumer protection plan seeking to qualify for this exemption shall provide all information necessary for the Attorney General or their delegate to (A) determine that the Consumer Protection Escrow Plan in which the seller of travel is a participant meets the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, (B) determine that the seller of travel is a participant in full compliance with the terms and conditions of an approved Consumer Protection Escrow Plan, and (C) provide a written agreement from the authorized representative of the Consumer Protection Escrow Plan in which the plan administrator agrees to give the office of the Attorney General, Consumer Protection Section, immediate written and telephonic notice in the event of termination of the seller of travel’s participation in the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 6.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.17.

(a) This section does not apply to sellers of travel who are exempt from the requirements of Section 17550.15 pursuant to Section 17550.16.

(b) Upon payment in full by the passenger for air or sea transportation and any related services with a credit card or with cash, the seller of travel shall issue and deliver the ticket or voucher to the passenger or his or her designated agent within 72 hours.

(c) Upon
 payment in full by the passenger for air or sea transportation and any related services with a check, the seller of travel shall issue and deliver the ticket or voucher to the passenger or his or her designated agent within 72 hours of the earlier of the following:

(1) The time the passenger’s payment is credited to the seller of travel’s account.

(2) The expiration of the maximum hold period specified in Section 10.190405 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) Tickets, vouchers, or receipts shall be deemed to have been delivered if they have been turned over to an independent third-party delivery service or the United States Postal Service for regular delivery.

(e) If the seller of travel is unable to issue tickets or vouchers upon
 payment as set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c), the seller of travel may comply with this section by taking either of the following actions:

(1) Timely forwarding to the air or sea carrier or provider of travel services, the portion of the sum paid by the passenger that is required by the air or sea carrier or provider of travel services from the seller of travel in order to provide the transportation or services purchased by that passenger and sending to the passenger within five business days of the date of the purchase or before the date of the passenger’s departure, whichever occurs first, a receipt describing the transportation and services that were purchased. The seller of travel may not offset or reduce the amount forwarded by any amounts due or claimed in connection with any other transaction.

(2) Complying with Sections 17550.13, 17550.14, and 17550.15.

(f) There is no violation of this section if compliance with this section was rendered impossible as a direct result of an unforeseen condition beyond the control of the seller of travel, and the seller of travel complied with this section or made restitution to the passenger within 30 days after the transportation or travel services purchased by the passenger were not provided.

(g) For purposes of this section, “72 hours” means three business days as defined in Section 9 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.18.

(a) If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(b) In a criminal action, a seller of travel has the burden of producing evidence to establish any exception to the provisions of this chapter; and in a
 civil action, a seller of travel has the burden of proof to establish any exception to the provisions of this chapter.

(c) Any action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, change, or annul any decision, determination, or finding of the Attorney General or his or her delegate pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 17550) or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

In such action or proceeding, the inquiry shall extend only to whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion shall be found by the court only if the decision, determination, or finding was not supported by substantial evidence in light of the entire written record before the Attorney General or his or her delegate at the time the decision, determination, or finding was made. The record before the
 court shall be the same written record upon which the Attorney General or his or her delegate acted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.19.

In addition to any civil penalties provided in this division, violation of this article is punishable as follows:

(a) As a misdemeanor by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment for each violation.

(b) In addition, any violation of Section 17550.14 or subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 17550.15 where money or real or personal property received or obtained by a seller of travel for transportation or travel services from any and all persons aggregates two thousand three hundred fifty dollars ($2,350) or more in any consecutive 12-month period, or the payment or
 payments by or on behalf of any one passenger exceeds in the aggregate nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) in any 12-month period, is punishable either as a misdemeanor or as a felony by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment for each violation.

(c) In addition, any intentional use for any purpose of a false seller of travel registration number, with intent to defraud, by an unregistered seller of travel is punishable as a misdemeanor or felony as provided in this section.

(d) Any violation of Section 17550.15 shall be a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in this section. Every act in violation of Section 17550.15 may be prosecuted as a separate and distinct violation and consecutive sentences
 may be imposed for each violation.

(e) Sellers of travel shall also comply with Sections 17537, 17537.1, and 17537.2 of the Business and Professions Code and all other applicable laws. This section shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of the criminal law of this state that applies or may apply to any transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 28.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.195.

(a) The Attorney General shall immediately suspend the registration of a seller of travel who has been convicted of a felony offense pursuant to Section 17550.19.

(b) A person who has been convicted of a felony offense pursuant to Section 17550.19 is prohibited, for a period of seven years commencing on the date of his or her conviction, from registering as a seller of travel and from participating in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.20.

(a) (1) Not less than 10 days before doing business in this state, a seller of travel shall apply for registration with the office of the Attorney General by filing with the Consumer Protection Section the information required by Section 17550.21 and paying the following fees, as applicable:

(A) A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each location from which the seller of travel conducts business.

(B) A late fee of five dollars ($5) per day, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500), for each day after the time specified by this section until the filing fee and the information required by Section 17550.21 are received.

(2) A seller of travel may annually renew its registration by making the filing required by Section 17550.21 and paying the filing fees and late fees required by paragraph (1).

(3) A registration shall not be issued, approved, or renewed until the late fee, the filing and late fees for each year the seller of travel operated without being registered, and any outstanding assessments due to the Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation as required by Sections 17550.43 and 17550.44 have been paid.

(4) A seller of travel shall be deemed to do business in this state if the seller of travel solicits business from locations in this state regardless of the geographic location of the prospective purchaser including persons located outside of this state or the country or solicits prospective purchasers who are located in this
 state.

(b) Registration shall be valid for one year from the effective date thereof shown on the registration issued by the office of the Attorney General.

(c) Whenever, before expiration of a seller of travel’s annual registration, there is a material change in the information required by Section 17550.21, the seller of travel shall, within 10 days, file an addendum updating the information with the Consumer Protection Section of the office of the Attorney General.

(d) (1) Not less than 10 days before the transfer or sale of any interest in a seller of travel, the selling or transferring owner shall file with the office of the Attorney General, Seller of Travel Program, a notice of encumbrance, sale, or transfer of ownership, using a form provided for that purpose by the office of the Attorney
 General. The notice shall provide the information required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17550.21 as to each transferee.

(2) Until the time the notice of encumbrance, sale, or transfer of ownership required in paragraph (1) is filed as required, the selling, encumbering, or transferring owner is responsible for all acts of and obligations imposed by law on the transferee sellers of travel to the same extent as they would have been responsible had there been no transfer, sale, or encumbrance.

(e) (1) The office of the Attorney General shall suspend the registration of a seller of travel who does any of the following:

(A) Fails to make any payment required pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35).

(B) Submits a check in payment of a registration fee or late fee required by this section that is not honored by the institution on which it is drawn.

(C) Fails to provide the file number assigned by the Secretary of State or the Franchise Tax Board to the seller of travel, as required by subdivision (m) of Section 17550.21.

(2) The Attorney General shall provide written notice to the seller of travel by first-class mail at the seller of travel’s place of business set forth in the registration statement that the seller of travel’s registration has been suspended until all fees that are due have been paid. The registration of the seller of travel shall be suspended until all such payments due have been collected.

(f) The Attorney General may, at their discretion and subject to supervision by the Attorney
 General or their delegate, contract out all or any part of the processing of registrations required by this section.

(g) This section does not apply to a person who is an individual, a single-member limited liability company whose sole member is an individual, or a single-shareholder “S” corporation whose sole shareholder is an individual, that meets all of the following:

(1) Has a written contract with a registered seller of travel to act on that registered seller of travel’s behalf in offering or selling air or sea transportation and other travel goods or services in connection with the transportation.

(2) Acts only on behalf of a registered seller of travel with whom the person has a written contract in the offer or sale to a passenger of air or sea transportation and other goods or services in connection with the
 transportation and sells no other air or sea transportation or travel services to that passenger.

(3) Provides air or sea transportation or travel services that are offered or sold pursuant to the official agency appointment of the registered seller of travel with whom the person has a written contract.

(4) Does not receive any consideration for air or sea transportation or other travel services from the passenger.

(5) Requires the passenger to pay all consideration for air or sea transportation or other travel services directly to the air carrier or ocean carrier or to the registered seller of travel.

(6) Discloses both of the following:

(A) The person is acting on behalf of a registered
 seller of travel.

(B) The name, address, telephone number, and registration number of the registered seller of travel on whose behalf the person is acting.

The person shall make the disclosures required by this paragraph in writing to the passenger at the same time the passenger receives notice under Section 17550.13. If the person transacts business in this state on the internet, the disclosures also shall appear on the home page of the person’s internet website and shall be prominently set forth in the first electronic mail message sent to the passenger that refers to the passenger’s purchase of air or sea transportation or travel services.

(h) Whenever the Attorney General determines that a registration application is accurate and complete, the application shall be processed and a registration certificate shall be issued to the seller
 of travel within 21 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 7.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.21.

Each filing pursuant to Section 17550.20 shall contain the following information:

(a) The name or names of the seller of travel, including the name under which the seller of travel is doing or intends to do business, if different from the name of the seller of travel.

(b) The seller of travel’s business form and place of organization and, if operating under a fictitious business name, the location where the fictitious name has been registered. If the seller of travel does business in California from one or more locations in this state but does not maintain its principal place of business in this state, the
 seller of travel shall state whether it meets the requirements of paragraph (16) of subdivision (e) of Section 17511.1.

(c) The complete street address or addresses of all locations from which the seller of travel will be conducting business, including, but not limited to, locations at which telephone calls will be received from, or made to, passengers or other sellers of travel. The statement shall designate which location is the principal place of business.

(d) The complete business and residential addresses and telephone numbers, the driver’s license number and state of issuance or equivalent personal identification, the social security number, and the date of birth of each owner and principal of the seller of travel. “Owner” means a person who owns or controls 10 percent or
 more of the equity of, or otherwise has claim to 10 percent or more of the net income of, a seller of travel. “Principal” means an owner, an officer of a corporation, a general partner of a partnership, or a sole proprietor of a sole proprietorship.

(e) A statement as to whether the seller of travel, any owner, or principal, or any other seller of travel owned or managed by any owner or principal of the seller of travel, or the seller of travel itself has had entered against that person or entity any judgment, including a stipulated judgment, order, made a plea of nolo contendere, or been convicted of any criminal violation. The statement shall identify the person, the court or administrative agency rendering the judgment, order, or conviction, the docket number of the matter, and the date of the judgment, order, or conviction; where the
 judgment, order, or record of conviction is filed; and the nature of the case or judgment. This subdivision does not require disclosure of marital dissolution, child support, or child custody proceedings.

(f) A copy of the travel certificates, if any, that are or will be sold, marketed, or distributed to any person or entity by the seller of travel.

(g) The seller of travel shall file with the Attorney General a signed and dated statement providing the following:

(1) The account number of each trust account required by this article.

(2) The name and address of each financial institution at which the seller of travel maintains a trust account required by this
 article.

(3) Any registration number issued to the seller of travel by the Airline Reporting Corporation or the International Association of Travel Agents Network.

(4) A consent form consenting to the Attorney General, a district attorney, or their representatives obtaining directly from the Airlines Reporting Corporation, International Association of Travel Agents Network, a seller of transportation, provider of transportation, provider of travel services, and any financial institution where passenger funds have been deposited, any information related to an investigation of a seller of travel’s compliance with this section. The consent form shall be provided by the Attorney General. If a bond is maintained in lieu of the trust account, a copy of that bond shall be filed with the
 Attorney General.

(h) A statement signed by each owner and principal granting permission to the office of the Attorney General to obtain from any financial institution or credit union at which any trust account required by Section 17550.15 is maintained, information relating to that trust account, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 17550.15.

(i) The name, address, and telephone number of each person described in subdivision (g) of Section 17550.20 with whom the seller of travel contracts.

(j) The name, address, and telephone number of the sole member or the sole shareholder of a limited liability company or “S” corporation described in subdivision (g) of Section 17550.20 with which the seller of travel contracts.

(k) If at the time of registration renewal, no change has occurred to the information provided in the last filed complete registration statement and the permission described in subdivision (h) has not expired, the seller of travel may, instead of filing a registration statement containing the information required by subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, file a statement attesting to the continued accuracy of the information in the last filed complete
 registration statement. The attestation shall be in a form specified by the Attorney General and verified as described in subdivision (l).

(l) The information required by this section shall be verified by a declaration signed and dated by each owner and principal of the seller of travel, or in the case of a registered seller of travel that does business in California, from one or more locations in California, and that meets the requirements of paragraph (16) of subdivision (e) of Section 17511.1, by a duly authorized officer of the corporation, under penalty of perjury pursuant to the laws of the State of California. The declaration shall specify the date and location of signing. Upon reregistration by a previously registered seller of travel, the information required by this section may be verified by the chief executive officer of a
 corporation, managing partner of a partnership, or manager of a limited liability company.

(m) The file number
 assigned by the Secretary of State or the Franchise Tax Board to the seller of travel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 517, Sec. 3.   (AB 2106)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.22.

No registration application shall be accepted for filing if it is incomplete or contains false information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1995, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.23.

(a) The Travel Consumer Restitution Corporation shall notify the office of the Attorney General whenever a seller of travel with its principal place of business in California, which does business with persons located in California, is in compliance with Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35).

(b) A registration application for a seller of travel who does not or intends not to comply with the requirements of Section 17550.15 because the seller of travel claims to
 meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 17550.16 shall be accompanied by evidence that the seller of travel is a participant in a Consumer Protection Deposit Plan that meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 17550.16.

(c) A registration application for a seller of travel who does not or intends not to comply with the requirements of Section 17550.15 because the seller of travel claims to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 17550.16 shall be accompanied by evidence that the seller of travel is a participant in a Consumer Protection Escrow Plan that meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 17550.16.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.24.

(a) The Attorney General or his or her delegate shall issue a separate registration number to each registrant whose registration is accepted. That registration number shall be valid for the period specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17550.20, unless revoked or suspended by the Attorney General or his or her delegate. Grounds for suspension or revocation include material misrepresentation in a registration application, or a failure to amend a registration as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 17550.20.

(b) Any registration issued to a seller of travel who is required to comply with the provisions of Section 17550.15 shall set forth the number and location of the required trust account.

(c) Any registration issued to a seller of travel who has complied with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 17550.23 shall state that the seller of travel claims an exemption from the requirements of Section 17550.15 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17550.16.

(d) Any registration issued to a seller of travel who has complied with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 17550.23 shall state that the seller of travel claims an exemption from the requirements of Section 17550.15 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17550.16.

(e) A registered seller
 of travel shall display a copy of its current registration certificate in a manner and place easily accessible to the public, in each location in which the seller of travel conducts its business, and shall provide a copy of its current registration upon request to any other registered seller of travel from whom it receives passenger funds in payment for transportation or travel services.

(f) The registration number of the seller of travel shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed on all advertising materials offering for sale or soliciting the purchase of any air or sea transportation or travel services, including, but not limited to, any writings, or promotional materials of any kind which are advertised, displayed, or disseminated in any manner to any persons in California, or from California to any person elsewhere. A registered seller of travel that does business in California from one or more locations in California and that meets the
 requirements of paragraph (16) of subdivision (e) of Section 17511.1 shall display its registration number only on advertising materials that are produced or placed by its business locations within California or that make reference to specific business locations offering air or sea transportation or travel services. Wherever seller of travel, registered seller of travel, or similar terms are used in any advertising materials, they shall be accompanied by a statement which discloses, at least as prominently, that “registration as a seller of travel does not constitute approval by the State of California.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 924, Sec. 14.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.25.

(a) All sellers of travel who are participants shall comply with Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) prior to engaging in those sales.

(b) Any seller of travel that is not a participant who is doing business with persons located in California shall make a clear and conspicuous disclosure, both orally and in writing, that the seller of travel is not a participant in the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund. Any seller of travel doing business from any location in
 California with persons located outside California shall make a clear and conspicuous disclosure, both orally and in writing, that the transaction is not covered by the Travel Consumer Restitution Fund. Any seller of travel required by the provisions of this article to have a trust account or bond shall make a clear and conspicuous disclosure of the existence of the trust account or of the issuer and amount of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 17550.33 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

17550.26.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “travel business discount program” means a membership, benefit program, identification card, identifying number, or other arrangement that identifies the purchaser of the travel business discount program as engaged in the travel business or otherwise qualified to receive discounts or reduced prices made available to persons involved in the travel business for transportation or any travel services.

(b) A person may sell a travel business
 discount program if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The represented discounts or reduced prices offered under the travel business discount program are not made generally available to the public.

(2) The benefits and limitations of the travel business discount program are clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the purchaser, in writing, before any consideration is paid by the purchaser.

(3) The sale is made only to a purchaser who is any of the following:

(A) A duly registered seller of travel.

(B) An owner or principal of a seller of travel listed on the seller of travel’s registration form.

(C) An employee of a
 seller of travel who was paid at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) in compensation in the prior 12 months by that seller of travel.

(D) A person described in subdivision (g) of Section 17550.20 who is listed on a seller of travel’s registration form and who was paid at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) in compensation in the prior 12 months by that seller of travel.

(c) A seller of a travel business discount program shall maintain records in this state establishing that each purchaser satisfies one of the criteria described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and shall produce those records for inspection and copying without charge at an office of the Attorney General within 10 calendar days of a written request by the Attorney General.

(d) A seller of a travel business discount program shall comply with the
 requirements for discount buying services pursuant to Title 2.6 (commencing with Section 1812.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 628, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.27.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
